6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX yV N 45
SFX yV ire ire ire po:infi
SFX yV ire isant ire po:ppre
SFX yV ire it nfire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yV ire its nfire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yV ire ite nfire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yV ire ites nfire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yV ire is cire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX yV ire ise cire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yV ire ises cire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yV ire i ffire po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX yV ire is ire po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yV ire it ire po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yV ire isons ire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yV ire isez ire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yV ire isent ire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yV ire isais ire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yV ire isait ire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yV ire isions ire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yV ire isiez ire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yV ire isaient ire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yV ire îmes ire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yV ire îtes ire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yV ire irent ire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yV ire irai ire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yV ire iras ire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yV ire ira ire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yV ire irons ire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yV ire irez ire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yV ire iront ire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yV ire irais ire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yV ire irait ire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yV ire irions ire po:cond po:1pl
SFX yV ire iriez ire po:cond po:2pl
SFX yV ire iraient ire po:cond po:3pl
SFX yV ire ise ire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yV ire ises ire po:spre po:2sg
SFX yV ire isse ire po:simp po:1sg
SFX yV ire isses ire po:simp po:2sg
SFX yV ire ît ire po:simp po:3sg
SFX yV ire issions ire po:simp po:1pl
SFX yV ire issiez ire po:simp po:2pl
SFX yV ire issent ire po:simp po:3pl
SFX yV ire is ire po:impe po:2sg
SFX yV ire isons ire po:impe po:1pl
SFX yV ire isez ire po:impe po:2pl
SFX yW N 38
SFX yW ire ire rire po:infi
SFX yW ire iant rire po:ppre
SFX yW ire i rire po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX yW ire is rire po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yW ire it rire po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yW ire ions rire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yW ire iez rire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yW ire ient rire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yW ire iais rire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yW ire iait rire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yW ire iions rire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yW ire iiez rire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yW ire iaient rire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yW ire îmes rire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yW ire îtes rire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yW ire irent rire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yW ire irai rire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yW ire iras rire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yW ire ira rire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yW ire irons rire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yW ire irez rire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yW ire iront rire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yW ire irais rire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yW ire irait rire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yW ire irions rire po:cond po:1pl
SFX yW ire iriez rire po:cond po:2pl
SFX yW ire iraient rire po:cond po:3pl
SFX yW ire ie rire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yW ire ies rire po:spre po:2sg
SFX yW ire isse rire po:simp po:1sg
SFX yW ire isses rire po:simp po:2sg
SFX yW ire ît rire po:simp po:3sg
SFX yW ire issions rire po:simp po:1pl
SFX yW ire issiez rire po:simp po:2pl
SFX yW ire issent rire po:simp po:3pl
SFX yW ire is rire po:impe po:2sg
SFX yW ire ions rire po:impe po:1pl
SFX yW ire iez rire po:impe po:2pl
SFX yX Y 30
SFX yX nuire nuire/s' nuire po:infi
SFX yX nuire nuisant/s' nuire po:ppre
SFX yX nuire nui nuire po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX yX nuire nuit/s' nuire po:ipre po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuisons nuire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yX nuire nuisez nuire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yX nuire nuisent/s' nuire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yX nuire nuisait/s' nuire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/s' nuire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yX nuire nuisit/s' nuire po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes nuire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes nuire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/s' nuire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yX nuire nuira/s' nuire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuirons nuire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yX nuire nuirez nuire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yX nuire nuiront/s' nuire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yX nuire nuirait/s' nuire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuirions nuire po:cond po:1pl
SFX yX nuire nuiriez nuire po:cond po:2pl
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/s' nuire po:cond po:3pl
SFX yX nuire nuise/s' nuire po:spre po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuisît/s' nuire po:simp po:3sg
SFX yX nuire nuisissions nuire po:simp po:1pl
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez nuire po:simp po:2pl
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/s' nuire po:simp po:3pl
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous nuire po:impe po:1pl ds:+pr
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous nuire po:impe po:2pl ds:+pr
SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/n'q'd'l'm't's' occire po:infi
SFX yY ccire ccis/L'D'Q' occire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX yY ccire ccise/L'D'Q' occire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yY ccire ccises/D'Q' occire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yZ N 14
SFX yZ rire rire rire po:infi
SFX yZ rire risant rire po:ppre
SFX yZ rire rit rire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yZ rire rits rire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yZ rire rite rire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yZ rire rites rire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yZ rire ris rire po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yZ rire rit rire po:ipre po:3sg
SFX yZ rire rirai rire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yZ rire riras rire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yZ rire rira rire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yZ rire rirais rire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yZ rire rirait rire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yZ rire ris rire po:impe po:2sg
SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+ enir enu/L'D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ enir enus/D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ enir enue/L'D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ enir enues/D'Q' enir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ tir ti/L'D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ tir tis/D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ tir tie/L'D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ tir ties/D'Q' tir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ courir couru/L'D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ courir courus/D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ courir courue/L'D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ courir courues/D'Q' courir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écu vivre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écus vivre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ ivre écue vivre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ ivre écues vivre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aire u aire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aire us aire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aire ue aire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aire ues aire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ dre du dre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ dre dus dre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ dre due dre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ dre dues dre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ valoir valu .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ valoir valus .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ valoir value .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ valoir values .valoir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aître u/L'D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aître us/D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aître ue/L'D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aître ues/D'Q' aître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q+ aitre u/L'D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX q+ aitre us/D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX q+ aitre ue/L'D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX q+ aitre ues/D'Q' aitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/q' enir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. tir ti/q' tir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. courir couru/q' courir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. ivre écu vivre po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aire u aire po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. dre du dre po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. valoir valu/q' .valoir po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aître u/q' aître po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q. aitre u/q' aitre po:ppas is:epi is:inv
