6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.dic
abstenir/i2q+()
apparaitre/wQq+()
apparaître/wQq+()
circoncire/yV()
circonvenir/i0q+()
comparaitre/wQq.()
comparaître/wQq.()
complaire/wNq.()
condescendre/tEq.()
confire/yV()
connaitre/wQq+()
connaître/wQq+()
consentir/i5q+()
contenir/i0q+()
contrevenir/i0q+()
convenir/i0q+()
correspondre/tEq.()
déconfire/yV()
démentir/i5q+()
démordre/tEq.()
départir/i5q+()
déplaire/wNq.()
détenir/i0q+()
devenir/i0q+()
disconvenir/i0q+()
disparaitre/wQq+()
disparaître/wQq+()
entrenuire/yX()
entre-nuire/yX()
entretenir/i1q+()
équivaloir/pNq.()
frire/yZ()
intervenir/i0q+()
maintenir/i0q+()
méconnaitre/wQq+()
méconnaître/wQq+()
mentir/i5q.()
morfondre/tEq+()
obtenir/i1q+()
obvenir/i0q+()
occire/yY()
paraitre/wQq+()
paraître/wQq+()
partir/i5q+()
parvenir/i0q+()
plaire/wNq.()
pressentir/i5q+()
prévaloir/pNq+()
prévenir/i0q+()
provenir/i0q+()
réapparaitre/wQq+()
réapparaître/wQq+()
recomparaitre/wQq.()
recomparaître/wQq.()
reconnaitre/wQq+()
reconnaître/wQq+()
redevenir/i0q+()
reparaitre/wQq+()
reparaître/wQq+()
repartir/i5q+()
repentir/i5q+()
ressentir/i5q+()
ressortir/i5q+()
ressouvenir/i0q+()
retenir/i0q+()
revenir/i0q+()
revivre/xSq+()
rire/yW()
sentir/i5q+()
sortir/i5q+()
sourire/yW()
soutenir/i0q+()
souvenir/i0q+()
subvenir/i0q.()
suffire/yV()
survenir/i0q+()
survivre/xSq.()
taire/wNq+()
tenir/i0q+()
transparaitre/wQq.()
transparaître/wQq.()
venir/i0q+()
vivre/xSq+()
